Washington statutes.
RCW 43.310.040

Cultural awareness retreats.

Cultural awareness retreats shall include but are not limited to the following programs:

(1) To develop positive attitudes and self-esteem.

(2) To develop youth decision-making ability.

(3) To assist with career development and educational development.

(4) To help develop respect for the community, and ethnic origin.

[ 1993 c 497 s 11.]